en: Incorrect product type
bg: Неправилен product type
ca: Tipus de producte incorrecte
da: Forkert produkttype
de: Falscher product type
es: Tipo de producto incorrecto
fi: Väärä product type
fr: Mauvais product type
hr: Pogrešan product type
it: Tipo di prodotto errato
nl: Verkeerd product type
pt: Tipo de produto incorreto
ru: Неправильный product type
sv: Fel produkttyp

en: Non open products facts
bg: Неприложими open products facts, Неприложими факти за неотворени продукти
ca: No open products facts
de: Nicht open products facts
es: No open products facts
fi: Ei open products facts
fr: Non open products facts
hr: Ne open products facts
it: Non open products facts
nl: Niet open products facts
pt: Não open products facts
ru: Не open products facts, Факты о неоткрытых продуктах

en: Open Beauty Facts, OBF, Hygiene
xx: Open Beauty Facts, OBF

en: Cosmetics
cs: Kosmetika
da: Kosmetik
de: Kosmetika
es: Cosméticos
fr: Cosmétiques
it: Cosmetici
ja: コスメ・スキンケア
nl: Cosmetica
no: Kosmetikk
pl: Kosmetyki
pt: Cosméticos
ru: Косметика
sv: Kosmetika
tr: Kozmetik

en: Personal care products
de: Körperpflegeprodukte
es: Productos de cuidado personal
fr: Produits de soins personnels

en: Open Food Facts, OFF
xx: Open Food Facts, OFF

en: Open Pet Food Facts, OPFF
xx: Open Pet Food Facts, OPFF

en: Pet food
de: Tiernahrung
es: Comida para mascotas
fr: Aliments pour animaux de compagnie

en: St. Patrick's Day supplies
da: Skt. Patricks dag-tilbehør
sv: Sankt Patriks dag-tillbehör

en: St. Patrick's Day decorations
da: Skt. Patricks dag-dekorationer
sv: Sankt Patriks dag-dekorationer

en: Animals & Pet Supplies
xx: Animals & Pet Supplies
cs: Chovatelství
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf
es: Productos para mascotas y animales
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie
it: Articoli per animali
ja: ペット・ペット用品
nl: Dieren
no: Dyr og kjæledyrutstyr
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt
pt: Animais e suprimentos para animais de estimação
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri

en: Live Animals
xx: Live Animals
cs: Živá zvířata
da: Levende dyr
de: Lebende Tiere
es: Animales vivos
fr: Animaux vivants
it: Animali vivi
ja: ペット
nl: Levende dieren
no: Levende dyr
pl: Żywe zwierzęta
pt: Animais vivos
ru: Живые животные
sv: Levande djur
tr: Canlı Hayvanlar

en: Pet Supplies
xx: Pet Supplies
cs: Potřeby pro domácí zvířata
da: Tilbehør til kæledyr
de: Haustierbedarf
es: Productos para mascotas
fr: Articles pour animaux de compagnie
it: Animali domestici - Articoli
ja: ペット用品
nl: Benodigdheden voor huisdieren
no: Kjæledyrutstyr
pl: Artykuły dla zwierząt
pt: Suprimentos para animais de estimação
ru: Товары для домашних животных
sv: Tillbehör till husdjur
tr: Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri

en: Bird Supplies
xx: Bird Supplies
cs: Potřeby pro ptáky
da: Tilbehør til fugle
de: Vogelbedarf
es: Productos para pájaros
fr: Accessoires pour oiseaux
it: Articoli per uccelli
ja: 鳥用品
nl: Benodigdheden voor vogels
no: Fugleutstyr
pl: Artykuły dla ptaków
pt: Suprimentos para pássaros
ru: Товары для птиц
sv: Fågeltillbehör
tr: Kuş Ürünleri

en: Bird Cage Accessories
xx: Bird Cage Accessories
cs: Ptačí klece – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til fuglebure
de: Vogelkäfigzubehör
es: Accesorios de jaulas para pájaros
fr: Accessoires pour cages à oiseaux
it: Accessori per gabbie per uccelli
ja: 鳥かご関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor vogelkooien
no: Tilbehør til fuglebur
pl: Akcesoria do klatek dla ptaków
pt: Acessórios para gaiolas de pássaros
ru: Принадлежности для птичьих клеток
sv: Tillbehör till fågelburar
tr: Kuş Kafesi Aksesuarları

en: Bird Cage Bird Baths
xx: Bird Cage Bird Baths
cs: Koupátka do ptačích klecí
da: Fuglebade til fuglebure
de: Vogelbäder für Vogelkäfige
es: Jaulas y baños para pájaros
fr: Baignoires pour cages à oiseaux
it: Vasche per uccelli per gabbie
ja: 鳥かご、バードバス
nl: Vogelbadjes voor vogelkooien
no: Badekar til fuglebur
pl: Wanienki dla ptaków
pt: Recipientes para banho para gaiola de pássaros
ru: Поилки для птичьих клеток
sv: Fågelbad för fågelbur
tr: Kuş Yuvası Kuş Banyoları

en: Bird Cage Food & Water Dishes
xx: Bird Cage Food & Water Dishes
cs: Nádoby na krmivo a vodu do ptačích klecí
da: Fuglemad og vandbeholdere
de: Futter- & Wasserspender für Vogelkäfige
es: Bebederos y comederos de jaulas para pájaros
fr: Mangeoires et abreuvoirs pour cages à oiseaux
it: Contenitori per acqua e cibo per gabbie per uccelli
ja: 鳥かご用餌入れ・水入れ
nl: Voer- en drinkbakjes voor vogelkooien
no: Mat- og vannskåler til fuglebur
pl: Pojemniki na żywność i wodę dla ptaków
pt: Recipientes para comida e água para gaiola de pássaros
ru: Кормушки и поилки для птичьих клеток
sv: Mat- och vattenbehållare för fågelburar
tr: Kuş Kafesi Yiyecek Kapları ve Sulukları

en: Bird Cages & Stands
xx: Bird Cages & Stands
cs: Ptačí klece a podstavce
da: Fuglebure og standere
de: Vogelkäfige & -ständer
es: Pies y jaulas para pájaros
fr: Cages et perchoirs à oiseaux
it: Gabbie e trespoli uccelli
ja: 鳥かご・鳥かご用スタンド
nl: Vogelkooien en standaards
no: Fuglebur og -stativer
pl: Klatki i stojaki dla ptaków
pt: Gaiolas e poleiros para pássaros
ru: Клетки и подставки для птиц
sv: Fågelburar och ställningar
tr: Kuş Kafesleri ve Stantları

en: Bird Cages
fr: Cages à oiseaux, Volières, Volière

en: Bird Food
xx: Bird Food
cs: Krmivo pro ptáky
da: Fuglefoder
de: Vogelfutter
es: Comida para pájaros
fr: Nourriture pour oiseaux
it: Mangime per volatili
ja: 鳥用フード
nl: Vogelvoer
no: Fuglemat
pl: Karma dla ptaków
pt: Ração para pássaros
ru: Корма для птиц
sv: Fågelmat
tr: Kuş Yemleri